District of Columbia statutes.
1-628.01

Authority.

The Mayor, the District of Columbia Board of Education, and the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia are hereby authorized and empowered to enter into reciprocal agreements for the use of equipment, materials, facilities, and services with any public or private agency or body for purposes deemed beneficial to the personnel system. For the purposes of agreements with federal agencies under this subchapter, the provisions of § 1-207.31 shall be met.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2801, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(aa), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(z), 43 DCR 2978

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-631.08.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-629.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-358.1.

Editor's Notes

Repeal of § 3 of Law 6-177: Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 provided that the provisions of § 3 are repealed on the 1st day following the 36-month period after February 24, 1987.

Repeal of § 4(b) of Law 6-177: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-74, effective March 15, 1990, provided that § 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 is repealed.